src/conjunctions.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+CONJ

! conjunctions / союзы
LEXICON Root
а         Conj;
будто     Conj;
ведь      Conj;
всё-таки  Conj;
где       Conj;
если      Conj;
же        Conj;
и         Conj;
как       Conj;
когда     Conj;
кто       Conj;
куда      Conj;
или       Conj;
ли        Conj;
либо      Conj;
нежели    Conj;
ни        Conj;
но        Conj;
однако    Conj;
пока      Conj;
поскольку Conj;
причём    Conj;
пусть     Conj;
также     Conj;
то        Conj;
тоже      Conj;
хотя      Conj;
чем       Conj;
что       Conj;
чтоб      Conj;
чтобы     Conj;

! потому что
! как будто
! после того, как
! так как
! тогда как

LEXICON Conj
+CONJ:0 #;
